New York, session 2025-2026, S9315.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of the veterans' services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 40 to read as follows: 3 40. To conduct a pre-release briefing as part of the discharge plan- 4 ning process with any incarcerated individual who is a veteran, prior to 5 their release from a state correctional institution, to explain and 6 share information relating to federal and state benefits available to 7 veterans and their families and how to apply for such benefits. The 8 department shall consult with the department of corrections and communi- 9 ty supervision to implement the provisions of this section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14764-01-6